District of Columbia statutes.
29-411.08

Applicability to foreign corporations.

In any derivative proceeding in the right of a foreign nonprofit corporation, the matters covered by this subchapter shall be governed by the laws of the jurisdiction of incorporation of the foreign corporation, except for §§ 29-411.04, 29-411.06, and 29-411.07.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-411.01.